Louisiana, session 2026, HB906.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:410.3, 445.1, 521(B)(1), 1280.21, and 1280.22(A) and (B)(3)(b)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§410.3. Purpose and nature of party primary elections
A. For general elections, major political parties shall make all nominations
of candidates for party primary office by direct primary elections held pursuant to
this Part. In party primary elections, each voter voting in such election may vote
only for a candidate who is affiliated with the same party as the voter. However, the
state central committee of a major political party may in its bylaws allow voters who
are not affiliated with a political party to participate in its party primary elections.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1154 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 906
B.(1) Voters not affiliated with a political party may vote in a major party
primary if a party primary ballot is selected by the voter prior to casting his ballot,
but such a voter may vote only in one major party primary. If an unaffiliated voter
chooses to vote in the first party primary of one political party, the unaffiliated voter
shall not vote in the second party primary of another political party. The state central
committee of a major political party shall notify the Department of State at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the opening of qualifying for the first party primary that
its bylaws allow for participation by voters not affiliated with a political party. The
notification shall be considered valid when the state central committee submits to the
Department of State a letter, on the major political party's letterhead and signed by
the state central committee's chairman, and a copy of the major political party's
current bylaws.
(2) If the state central committee of a major political party prohibits an
unaffiliated voter from participating in its primary elections, the state central
committee of such party shall notify the Department of State at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the opening of qualifying for the first party primary that the state
central committee prohibits participation by voters not affiliated with a political
party. The notification shall be considered valid when the state central committee
submits to the Department of State a letter, on the major political party's letterhead
and signed by the state central committee's chairman, and a copy of the major
political party's current bylaws.
C. An unaffiliated voter who is allowed to participate in the primary election
of a major political party pursuant to Subsection B of this Section may vote if a party
primary ballot is selected by the voter prior to casting his ballot, but such a voter may
vote only in one major party primary. If an unaffiliated voter chooses to vote in the
first party primary of one major political party, the unaffiliated voter shall not vote
in the second party primary of another major political party.
* * *
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1154 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 906
§445.1. Political party committees; election
A. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Part, if the presidential
preference primary is repealed, all elections for members of a state central committee
or a parish executive committee of a recognized political party shall occur at the
same time as the statewide presidential general election.
B. If the state central committee of a major political party notifies the
Department of State that voters not affiliated with a political party may choose to
participate in its primary elections pursuant to R.S. 18:410.3(B), such notification
shall also allow unaffiliated voters to choose to participate in elections for the state
central committee and parish executive committee of the major political party. Any
voter who is not affiliated with any political party and who is allowed to cast his vote
on the ballot of a major political party shall cast his vote on the ballot for only one
major political party.
* * *
§521. Qualifications of voters
* * *
B. Candidates for party office. (1) In a primary or general election at which
members of a political party committee are voted on, only qualified voters who are
registered as being affiliated with the same political party as the candidates for
membership on a political party committee may vote on such candidates. However,
the state central committee of a major political party as defined in R.S. 18:410.1 may
allow in its bylaws voters who are not affiliated with any political party to participate
in an election at which members of a political party committee are voted on. The
secretary of state shall adjust the voting machines so that the candidates for
membership on a political party committee may only be voted on by voters who are
registered as being affiliated with the same political party as the candidates, unless
provided for otherwise by a state central committee.
* * *
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1154 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 906
§1280.21. Presidential preference primary election
A. A statewide presidential preference primary election shall be held on the
last Saturday in March in 2024 and every fourth year thereafter for the purpose of
allowing the electors voters of each political party in the state which has forty
thousand or more registered members to express their preference for a person to be
the nominee of the party for president of the United States.
B. Each elector voter voting in such election may vote only for a candidate
who is affiliated with the same party as the elector voter.
C. If the state central committee of a major political party as defined in R.S.
18:410.1 notifies the Department of State that voters not affiliated with a political
party may choose to participate in its party primaries pursuant to R.S. 18:410.3(B),
such notification shall also allow unaffiliated voters to chose to participate in the
statewide presidential preference primary election of the major political party. Any
voter who is not affiliated with any political party and who is allowed to cast his vote
on the ballot of a major political party shall cast his vote on the ballot of only one
major political party.
§1280.22. Candidates; procedure for qualifying
A. Candidates for presidential nominee shall qualify in accordance with
procedures established by the party. Prior to qualification as a candidate of a
political party for presidential nominee, a person shall pay a qualifying fee of one
thousand dollars and any additional fees as authorized by R.S. 18:464(B)(5) and (C)
or shall have obtained a nominating petition, bearing the handwritten signatures of
no less than one thousand two thousand five hundred registered voters affiliated with
the party, not less than two hundred fifty of which shall be from each of the
congressional districts into which the state is divided. If the candidate is qualifying
by paying a fee, the fee shall be paid in cash, by certified or cashier's check drawn
on a state or national bank or credit union, by United States postal money order, or
by a money order issued by a state or national bank or credit union.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1154 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 906
B.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b) Each In addition to his signature, each voter who signs a nominating
petition shall include his name and residence address provide the information
required by R.S. 18:3. Once a voter has signed a nominating petition, he may not
withdraw the nomination.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.